Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage
189.281.
Local government pilot program for off-highway vehicles. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

After June 29, 2021 and until July 1, 2024:

As used in this section:

“Local government” means a city, county, charter county government, urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified local government that is located within the boundaries of a regional authority, or the Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority established under KRS

148.0222

, acting on behalf of a local government that is part of the authority;

“Off-highway vehicle” or “OHV” means a motorized vehicle that:

Is designed to be primarily used for recreational purposes;

Has a maximum speed that is greater than thirty-five (35) miles per hour;

Is equipped with the following:

Four (4) to six (6) highway or nonhighway tires;

A steering wheel or steering mechanism;

Brakes;

Headlamps;

Tail lamps;

Brake lights;

One (1) red reflex reflector on each side as far to the rear as practicable and one (1) red reflex reflector on the rear;

A working muffler;

A parking brake;

A spark arrestor; and

For multi-passenger vehicles, an exterior mirror mounted on the driver’s side of the vehicle, either an interior mirror or an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger’s side of the vehicle, and for each designated seating position, a seatbelt assembly that conforms to the federal motor vehicle safety standard provided in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.209; and

“Regional authority” means:

The Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority established in KRS

148.0222

; and

Any other authority established in Kentucky Revised Statutes, prior to June 29, 2021, that oversees lands in two (2) or more contiguous counties, on which there is a system of recreational trails, including streams, rivers, and other waterways, and appurtenant facilities, including trailhead centers, parking areas, camping facilities, picnic areas, recreational areas, historic or cultural interpretive sites, and other facilities in Kentucky and designated by the regional authority.

The legislative body of a local government that is currently or formerly located within the boundaries of a regional authority, or which currently operates a public OHV trail system, may establish a pilot program, by ordinance, to authorize and regulate the operation of an OHV on any public roadway or any section of city or county roadway for which it bears responsibility.

Prior to enacting an OHV ordinance under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the legislative body of a local government shall notify the public of its plans to allow OHV use on roadways under its jurisdiction. Public notice under this paragraph shall:

Notify the public of the time, subject, and location of the public meeting and shall be posted in both a local newspaper, if any, and a newspaper of general circulation in the county;

Include a list and map of all roadways and connecting trails that the local government intends to designate for OHV use; and

Be placed on the Web site of the local government.

A local government may petition the Transportation Cabinet to include, in an OHV ordinance adopted under paragraph (a) of this subsection, state-maintained roadways or sections of state-maintained roadways located within the local government’s jurisdictional boundaries. The local government shall submit the following to the Transportation Cabinet for approval:

The minutes from the public meeting or meetings held prior to adoption of an OHV ordinance under this subsection;

A list and map of all roadways and connecting trails that the local government intends to designate for OHV use;

An enforcement plan to ensure that all OHVs operating on roadways under this section meet all of the requirements established under this section, including verification of required insurance coverage;

A plan to notify the public and OHV users of the operation of OHVs on state and local roadways within the boundaries of the local government;

A safety plan for OHV roadway use; and

Any other requirements established by the Transportation Cabinet under subsection (16) of this section.

The Transportation Cabinet shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt of a petition and all information required in paragraph (c) of this subsection, respond to the local government with approval or denial of the request submitted.

Any OHV ordinance adopted under this section shall be adopted at a public meeting.

A fully controlled access highway shall not be designated for OHV use under this section.

A local government that has enacted an OHV ordinance under this section shall notify the Transportation Cabinet of any collision involving an OHV that occurred on any roadway approved for OHV use under this section.

A person may operate an OHV on a public roadway pursuant to subsection (2) of this section if the:

Operator is eighteen (18) years of age or older;

Operator has a valid operator’s license in his or her possession;

OHV is insured by the owner or operator, for the payment of tort liabilities in the same form and amounts as set forth in KRS

304.39-110

for motorcycles;

Proof of insurance is inside the OHV at all times of operation on a public roadway; and

OHV is equipped with all safety equipment required under this section.

Any person operating an OHV on a public roadway under this section shall be subject to the same traffic regulations of this chapter as a motor vehicle, including KRS

189.520

prohibiting the operation of a vehicle that is not a motor vehicle, while under the influence of intoxicants or substances which may impair driving.

A person shall not operate an OHV under this section on any public roadway:

Between one (1) hour after sunset and one (1) hour before sunrise, unless the person can demonstrate cause for driving, including but not limited to emergencies; or

While carrying passengers on a trailer or any other towed unit.

Any passenger of an OHV that is under the age of sixteen (16) shall be required to wear a helmet that meets the national standards prescribed by the United States Department of Transportation.

An operator and any passengers shall wear eye protection when operating or riding an OHV that is not equipped with a windshield.

The Transportation Cabinet shall be responsible for the cost, placement, and maintenance of signage denoting state highways that have been authorized for OHV use under this section.

The local government shall be responsible for the cost, placement, and maintenance of signage denoting local roadways that have been designated for OHV use under this section.

The local government shall be responsible for monthly inspection of state and local OHV signage.

An OHV operating on a public roadway designated by a local government under subsection (2) of this section is not considered to be a motor vehicle and shall be exempt from:

Vehicle registration requirements of KRS

186.050

; and

Emissions compliance certificates pursuant to KRS

224.20-720

.

A local government may adopt more stringent local ordinances governing OHV safety equipment and operation than specified in this section.

If deemed in the interest of public safety, the Transportation Cabinet may:

Prohibit the operation of an OHV on any public roadway designated under subsection (2) of this section that crosses a state-maintained roadway; or

Rescind approval given under subsection (2)(d) of this section.

This section shall not apply to:

An OHV operated on any private or public recreational trail or area;

An OHV operating under the exemptions for highway use under KRS

189.515

; or

A publicly owned and operated OHV used for wildlife management, law enforcement, emergency services, or other governmental purposes.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to require an insurance company to provide OHV insurance coverage.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section, including but not limited to:

Prescribing of any forms or applications needed;

Establishing criteria for OHV ordinances;

Establishing OHV enforcement requirements;

Establishing criteria for rescinding approval pursuant to subsection (13) of this section;

Establishing OHV safety requirements;

Establishing OHV safety equipment verification protocol; and

Establishing OHV safety plan requirements.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 186, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was created by Sec- tion 6 of 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 186. Section 9 of that Act provides that “Sections 6 to 8 of this Act are part of a pilot program and shall sunset on July 1, 2024.”

189.282.
Operation of low-speed vehicle on highway.

As used in this section, “low-speed vehicle” shall have the same meaning as in KRS

186.010

.

A person may operate a low-speed vehicle on a highway if:

The vehicle meets the federal motor vehicle safety standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.500;

The vehicle displays a seventeen (17) character vehicle identification number that meets the requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. 565;

The posted speed limit of the highway is thirty-five (35) miles per hour or less;

The operator of the low-speed vehicle does not cross a roadway at an at-grade intersection where the roadway being crossed has a posted speed limit of more than thirty-five (35) miles per hour unless the intersection is equipped with an electronic traffic signal;

The operator has a valid operator’s license in his or her possession; and

The low-speed vehicle has not been modified to increase its speed above its original standard manufactured limit.

A low-speed vehicle operating on a highway shall be insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

by the owner or operator, and the proof of insurance shall be inside the vehicle at all times of operation on a highway.

A low-speed vehicle operating on a highway is considered to be a motor vehicle as defined in KRS

186.010

and shall be titled in accordance with KRS Chapter 186A and registered as a motor vehicle in accordance with KRS 186.050(3)(a).

An operator of a low-speed vehicle operating on a highway shall comply with the traffic regulations of KRS Chapter 189 and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 189A.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 103, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

189.283.
Regulation of commercial parcel delivery made by means of low-speed vehicle, golf cart, or utility vehicle — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section:

“Commercial delivery personnel” means employees of a licensed commercial delivery service;

“Golf cart” has the same meaning as in KRS

189.286

;

“Local government” has the same meaning as in KRS

189.286

;

“Low-speed vehicle” has the same meaning as in KRS

186.010

;

“Residential area” means areas zoned primarily or exclusively for single-family or multifamily residential use; and

“Utility vehicle” means a vehicle designed and manufactured for general maintenance, security, and landscaping purposes, but does not include any vehicle designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property on a street or highway, a golf cart, or an all-terrain vehicle as defined in KRS

189.010

.

Commercial delivery personnel may operate low-speed vehicles, golf carts, or utility vehicles solely for the purpose of delivering express envelopes and packages if:

The operator has a valid operator’s license in his or her possession;

The vehicles are solely operated in residential areas and on public roadways with a posted speed limit of thirty-five (35) miles per hour or less;

At any point after a required notice of intent to operate is provided to the local government pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, the local government having jurisdiction over the public roadways described in paragraph (b) of this subsection has not enacted an ordinance prohibiting commercial delivery personnel from operating on those roadways;

The size of the combined length and girth packages does not exceed one hundred thirty (130) inches and the weight of the packages does not exceed one hundred fifty (150) pounds; and

The vehicles are being operated between:

Sunrise and sunset; or

A time period specified by local ordinance under the provisions of subsection (6) of this section.

Vehicles operating under subsection (2) of this section shall:

Be titled in accordance with KRS Chapter 186A;

Be registered as a motor vehicle in accordance with KRS 186.050(3)(a);

Be insured in compliance with KRS

281.655

;

Meet the federal motor vehicle safety standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.500;

Be marked in a conspicuous manner with the name of the delivery service;

Bear an identifying sticker or tag issued by the cabinet. The sticker or tag shall carry a unique ID; and

Comply with vehicle standards established by administrative regulations promulgated under subsection (9) of this section.

Commercial delivery personnel may pull a trailer from vehicles operated under this section if the trailer is registered in accordance with KRS 186.675(4).

Commercial delivery personnel operating a vehicle on a public roadway under this section shall be subject to the traffic regulations in this chapter.

The governing body of a local government may, by local ordinance, regulate a vehicle operating under this section on any public roadway under its jurisdiction by specifying:

Each roadway that is prohibited for use by vehicles operating under this section; and

The time period during which vehicles under this section may operate.

A local ordinance adopted under this section shall not assess fees or set forth vehicle equipment requirements.

At least sixty (60) days prior to commencing the operation of low-speed vehicles, golf carts, or utility vehicles under this section, a commercial delivery service shall provide notice to a local government of its intent to operate on roadways under the local government’s jurisdiction. Notification under this subsection shall not be required for local governments that have adopted an ordinance under KRS

189.286

.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements and to set forth standards for vehicles used by commercial delivery personnel operating under this section, including but not limited to issuance of an identification sticker or tag.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 184, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

189.284.
Operation of alternative-speed motorcycle on highway.

As used in this section, “alternative-speed motorcycle” shall have the same meaning as in KRS

186.010

.

A person may operate an alternative-speed motorcycle on a highway if:

The motorcycle bears a sticker, affixed by the manufacturer or dealer, on the left side of the rear window that indicates the vehicle’s maximum speed rating;

The motorcycle is equipped with:

Headlights, front and rear turn signal lights, taillights, and brake lights;

Three (3) red reflectors, two (2) of which must be placed on each side as far to the rear of the vehicle as practicable, and one (1) of which must be placed on the rear of the vehicle;

An exterior mirror mounted on the driver’s side of the vehicle and either an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger’s side of the vehicle or an interior mirror;

A parking brake;

A windshield that conforms to the federal motor vehicle safety standard provided in 49 C.F.R. 571.205;

A seatbelt assembly that conforms to the federal motor vehicle safety standard provided in 49 C.F.R. 571.209; and

A roll bar, roll cage, or crushproof body design;

The posted speed limit of the highway is thirty-five (35) miles per hour or less;

The operator of the alternative-speed vehicle does not cross a roadway at an at-grade intersection where the roadway being crossed has a posted speed limit of more than thirty-five (35) miles per hour unless the intersection is equipped with an electronic traffic signal;

The operator has a valid motorcycle operator’s license in his or her possession; and

The alternative-speed motorcycle has not been modified to increase its speed above its original standard manufactured limit.

An alternative-speed motorcycle operating on a highway shall be insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

by the owner or operator, and the proof of insurance shall be inside the vehicle at all times of operation on a highway.

An alternative-speed motorcycle operating on a highway is considered to be a motorcycle as defined in KRS

186.010

and shall be titled in accordance with KRS Chapter 186A and registered as a motorcycle in accordance with KRS 186.050(2).

An operator of an alternative-speed motorcycle shall be exempt from the protective headgear requirements of KRS

189.285

.

Except as provided in this section, an operator of an alternative-speed motorcycle operating on a highway shall comply with the traffic regulations of KRS Chapter 189 and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 189A.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 103, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

189.285.
Regulations for operating and riding on motorcycles — Headgear requirements — Definitions of motorcycle and moped.

A person shall not operate a motorcycle on a highway:

Except when that person is in possession of a valid motorcycle operator’s license; and

Unless that person uses an approved eye-protective device, in the manner prescribed by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, at all times such vehicle is in motion; and

Unless the motorcycle is equipped with a rear-view mirror as required under KRS

189.130

.

A person shall not operate or ride as a passenger on a motorcycle:

Except on a seat permanently attached to that vehicle and specifically designed to carry the operator or passenger in a safe manner; and

Except when using a footrest permanently attached to that vehicle and specifically designed to carry that person in a safe manner.

The following persons shall be required to wear protective headgear, in the manner prescribed by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, at all times the motorcycles they are riding are in motion on a public highway:

A person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who is operating a motorcycle or who is a passenger on a motorcycle or in a sidecar attachment;

A person who possesses a motorcycle instruction permit and who is operating a motorcycle; and

A person who has held a valid motorcycle operator’s license, or combination motor vehicle-motorcycle operator’s license, for less than one (1) year and who is operating a motorcycle.

A motorcycle operator authorized to drive a motorcycle on an instruction permit shall not be authorized to carry passengers.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall by regulation fix minimum standards for approved protective headgear and for approved eye-protective devices, and prescribe the manner in which they shall be used. The secretary shall maintain and cause to be published a list of approved protective headgear and of approved eye-protective devices. The secretary may prescribe by regulation minimum standards for other protective devices and require the use of those devices.

As used in this chapter:

“Motorcycle” means any motor-driven vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, but excluding tractors and vehicles on which the operator and passengers ride in an enclosed cab and excluding a moped as defined in this subsection; and

“Moped” means either a motorized bicycle whose frame design may include one (1) or more horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank so long as it also has pedals, or a motorized bicycle with a step-through type frame which may or may not have pedals rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty (50) cubic centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 63, § 1; 1972, ch. 203, § 36; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(10); 1976, ch. 173, § 6; 1978, ch. 349, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 434, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 194, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 319, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 393, § 47, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 43, § 3, effective June 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 173, § 10, effective July 12, 2006.

189.2851.
Operation, titling, registration, and insuring of motor scooters — Headgear requirements.

As used in this section, “motor scooter” has the same meaning as in KRS

186.010

.

A person may operate a motor scooter on a highway if the operator has a valid motorcycle operator’s license or motorcycle instructional permit in his or her possession.

A motor scooter operating on a highway is considered to be a motorcycle as defined in KRS

186.010

and shall be titled in accordance with KRS Chapter 186A and registered as a motorcycle in accordance with KRS 186.050(2).

A motor scooter operating on a highway shall be insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-110

by the owner or operator, and the proof of insurance shall be in possession of the operator at all times of operation on a highway.

A person operating a motor scooter on a highway shall comply with the traffic regulations of this chapter, meet the same equipment standards as those for motorcycles in this chapter, and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 189A.

A person operating a motor scooter shall be subject to the protective headgear requirements of KRS

189.285

.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 22, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

189.286.
Local government may permit operation of golf cart on public roadway — Ordinance — Qualifications for operation — Exemption from title, registration, and emissions compliance requirements — Preemption by Transportation Cabinet.

As used in this section:

“Golf cart” means any self-propelled vehicle that:

Is designed for the transportation of players or maintaining equipment on a golf course, while engaged in the playing of golf, supervising the play of golf, or maintaining the condition of the grounds on a golf course;

Has a minimum of four (4) wheels;

Is designed to operate at a speed of not more than thirty-five (35) miles per hour;

Is designed to carry not more than six (6) persons, including the driver;

Has a maximum gross vehicle weight of two thousand five hundred (2,500) pounds;

Has a maximum rated payload capacity of one thousand two hundred (1,200) pounds; and

Is equipped with the following:

Headlamps;

Tail lamps;

Stop lamps;

Front and rear turn signals;

One (1) red reflex reflector on each side as far to the rear as practicable, and one (1) red reflex reflector on the rear;

An exterior mirror mounted on the driver’s side of the vehicle and either an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger’s side of the vehicle or an interior mirror;

A parking brake;

For each designated seating position, a seatbelt assembly that conforms to the federal motor vehicle safety standard provided in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.209; and

A horn that meets the requirements of KRS

189.080

; and

“Local government” means a city, county, charter county government, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, or special district.

The governing body of a local government may authorize and regulate the operation of a golf cart on any public roadway under its jurisdiction if the local government adopts an ordinance specifying each roadway that is open for golf cart use.

An ordinance created under subsection (2) of this section shall require that a golf cart operated on a designated public roadway:

Be issued a permit for the golf cart by the local government;

Display a sticker or permit that identifies that the golf cart is allowed to be operated on specific roadways within the local government; and

Be inspected by a certified inspector designated by the county sheriff and certified through the Department of Vehicle Regulation to ensure that the golf cart complies with the requirements of this section. The inspection fee under this paragraph shall not exceed five dollars ($5) with an additional fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per trip charged if it becomes necessary for the certified inspector to travel to the site of the golf cart rather than having the golf cart brought to the sheriff’s inspection area.

A person may operate a golf cart on a public roadway pursuant to subsection (2) of this section if:

The posted speed limit of the designated public roadway is thirty-five (35) miles per hour or less;

The operator of the golf cart does not cross a roadway at an intersection where the roadway being crossed has a posted speed limit of more than thirty-five (35) miles per hour;

The operator has a valid operator’s license in his or her possession; and

The golf cart displays a slow-moving vehicle emblem in compliance with KRS

189.820

.

A golf cart operating on a public roadway under subsection (2) of this section shall be insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

by the owner or operator, and the proof of insurance shall be inside the golf cart at all times of operation on a public roadway.

Any person operating a golf cart on a public roadway under the provisions of this section shall be subject to the traffic regulations of KRS Chapter 189.

A golf cart operating on a public roadway designated by a local government under subsection (2) of this section is not considered to be motor a vehicle and is exempt from:

Title requirements of KRS

186.020

;

Vehicle registration requirements of KRS

186.050

; and

Emissions compliance certificates pursuant to KRS

224.20-720

.

A local government may adopt more stringent local ordinances governing golf cart safety equipment and operation than specified in this section.

The Transportation Cabinet may prohibit the operation of a golf cart on a public roadway designated under subsection (2) of this section that crosses a state-maintained highway under its jurisdiction if it determines that such prohibition is necessary in the interest of public safety.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a golf cart that is not used on a public roadway except to cross a roadway while following a golf cart path on a golf course.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 34, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

189.287.
Bicycle safety regulations and standards.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to set forth standards for bicycle equipment and the safe operation of a bicycle. The regulations shall include requirements for lights, reflectors, and audible warning devices. Bicycles and riders which comply with the regulations promulgated under this section are exempt from municipal and other local government regulations concerning safety equipment but not method of operation. In promulgating the administrative regulations, the Transportation Cabinet shall permit use of lightweight modern technological substitutes for lights, reflectors, and bells. The purpose of this section is to encourage bicycling and bicycle touring in this state by enabling bicycle riders to make use of modern technology to make their presence known to other users of the road. The Transportation Cabinet may consult with organizations of bicycle riders to aid it in the search for bicycle safety equipment and rules convenient for long distance bicycle riders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 101, § 1; 2006, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 173, § 11, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). This section was amended by 2006 Ky. Acts chs. 105 and 173, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 173, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

189.288.
Operation, insuring, titling, and registration of autocycles — Exemption from headgear requirements.

As used in this section, “autocycle” has the same meaning as in KRS

186.010

.

A person may operate an autocycle on a highway if the operator has a valid operator’s license in his or her possession.

An operator of an autocycle shall not be required to obtain a motorcycle license or endorsement.

An autocycle operating on a highway shall be insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-110

by the owner or operator, and the proof of insurance shall be inside the vehicle at all times of operation on a highway.

An autocycle operating on a highway is considered to be a motorcycle as defined in KRS

186.010

and shall be titled in accordance with KRS Chapter 186A and registered as a motorcycle in accordance with KRS 186.050(2).

A person operating an autocycle on a highway shall comply with the traffic regulations of KRS Chapter 189 and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 189A.

An operator of an autocycle shall be exempt from the protective headgear requirements of KRS

189.285

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

189.289.
Operation of electric low-speed scooter on highway, bicycle lane, or bicycle path.

A person sixteen (16) years of age or older, may operate an electric low-speed scooter on a highway, bicycle lane, or bicycle path.

A person operating an electric low-speed scooter under this section shall be subject to traffic regulations outlined in this chapter, and the provisions of KRS

189.520

.

An electric low-speed scooter shall be equipped with and shall have illuminated, at least one (1) headlamp and at least one (1) rear red light when:

Operated during the period from one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise; or

At such other times as atmospheric conditions render visibility as low as or lower than is ordinarily the case during that period.

An electric low-speed scooter may be parked on a sidewalk in a manner that does not impede the reasonable movement of pedestrian or any other traffic.

An operator of an electric low-speed scooter and any company or entity that provides electric low-speed scooters for rental, shall comply with all local government ordinances.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish safe operating standards for electric low-speed scooters. Administrative regulations established under this section shall not include any equipment or helmet use requirements.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 22, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

189.290.
Operator of vehicle to drive carefully.

The operator of any vehicle upon a highway shall operate the vehicle in a careful manner, with regard for the safety and convenience of pedestrians and other vehicles upon the highway.

No person shall willfully operate any vehicle on any highway in such a manner as to injure the highway.

History.

2739g-33, 2739g-35.

189.292.
Use of personal communication device prohibited while operating motor vehicle in motion on traveled portion of roadway — Exclusions — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, “personal communication device” means a device capable of two (2) way audio or text communication that emits an audible signal, vibrates, displays a message, or otherwise summons or delivers communication to the possessor, including but not limited to a paging device and a cellular telephone.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no person shall, while operating a motor vehicle that is in motion on the traveled portion of a roadway, write, send, or read text-based communication using a personal communication device to manually communicate with any person using text-based communication, including but not limited to communications referred to as a text message, instant message, or electronic mail.

Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:

The use of a global positioning system feature of a personal communication device;

The use of a global positioning or navigation system that is physically or electronically integrated into the motor vehicle;

The reading, selecting, or entering of a telephone number or name in a personal communication device for the purpose of making a phone call;

An operator of an emergency or public safety vehicle, when the use of a personal communication device is an essential function of the operator’s official duties; or

The operator of a motor vehicle who writes a text message on a personal communication device to:

Report illegal activity;

Summon medical help;

Summon a law enforcement or public safety agency; or

Prevent injury to a person or property.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited to updates or advances in the automotive and information technology industries.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 110, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 59, § 3, effective June 8, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Cell Phones Pose a Distraction to Drivers but Legislative Ban Is Not the Answer, 98 Ky. L.J. 177 (2009/2010).

189.294.
Use of personal communication device by minor prohibited while operating motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped in motion on traveled portion of roadway — Exclusions — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, “personal communication device” shall have the same meaning as defined in KRS

189.292

.

Any person under the age of eighteen (18) who has been issued an instruction permit, intermediate license, or operator’s license shall not operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped that is in motion on the traveled portion of a roadway while using a personal communication device, except to summon medical help or a law enforcement or public safety agency in an emergency situation.

Use of a personal communication device does not include a stand-alone global positioning system, a global positioning or navigation system that is physically or electronically integrated into the motor vehicle, or an in-vehicle security, diagnostics, and communications system, but does include manually entering information into the global positioning system feature of a personal communication device.

This section shall not apply to the use of a citizens band radio or an amateur radio by a motor vehicle operator.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited to updates or advances in the automotive and information technology industries.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 110, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 59, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Cell Phones Pose a Distraction to Drivers but Legislative Ban Is Not the Answer, 98 Ky. L.J. 177 (2009/2010).

189.300.
Vehicles to keep to right — Exceptions.

The operator of any vehicle when upon a highway shall travel upon the right side of the highway whenever possible, and unless the left side of the highway is clear of all other traffic or obstructions for a sufficient distance ahead to permit the overtaking and passing of another vehicle to be completed without interfering with the operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle being overtaken. The overtaking vehicle shall return to the proper traffic lane as soon as practicable and, if the passing vehicle enters the oncoming traffic lane, before coming within two hundred (200) feet of any approaching vehicle.

The operator of any vehicle moving slowly upon a highway shall keep his vehicle as closely as practicable to the right-hand boundary of the highway, allowing more swiftly moving vehicles reasonably free passage to the left, unless signage or markings indicate otherwise.

HISTORY:

2739g-35, 2739g-45: amend. Acts 2006, ch. 173, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2018 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

189.310.
Vehicles meeting other vehicles and animals.

Two (2) vehicles passing or about to pass each other in opposite directions shall have the right-of-way, and no other vehicle to the rear of those two (2) vehicles shall pass or attempt to pass either of those vehicles.

Vehicles proceeding from opposite directions shall pass each other from the right, each giving to the other one-half (1/2) of the highway as nearly as possible.

Every person operating a vehicle on a highway and approaching any animal being ridden or driven, shall exercise every reasonable precaution to prevent frightening the animal and to insure the safety of the person riding or driving it.

History.

2739g-36, 2739g-39, 2739g-44: amend. Acts 2006, ch. 173, § 13, effective July 12, 2006.

189.320.
Ambulances, patrols, and fire apparatus to have right of way. [Repealed.]